apertium-kaz-kir.kaz.lexc
LEXICON CLIT-GENERAL ! Includes personal copula suffixes, therefore appears only
                     ! after nominal parts of speech (and only after some cases)
                     ! FIXME: to be checked whether leads to any overgeneration
CLIT ;
V-PERS-COP ;





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     NOMINAL INFLECTION (N-INFL-COMMON)

! The following combinations are possible (examples in Tatar):
!
! stem > case                                        : әти<nom> : әтине<acc>
!
! stem > poss-real > case                            : әтием<px1sg><nom> : әтиемне<px1sg><acc>
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы/дай(*1)               : әтиемнеке/китабындагы,өегездәге/әтиемдәй
! stem > poss-real > ныкы/дагы > case                : Монда _эчеңдәгене_ тышка чыгарырга ярамый. (источник: musulman.su) 
! stem > poss-real > [ныкы]/дагы > poss-real > case  : _Эчендәгесе_(*3) – тышында, диләр андый кешеләр турында. (источник: beznen.ru)
!
! stem > ныкы/дагы/дай                               : әтинеке/әтидәге/әтидәй
! stem > ныкы/дагы(*2) > case                        : Бу соңгы _еллардагының_ өчтән икесе чамасы.
!
! stem > сыз(abe)                  WORKS
! stem > сыз(abe) > case
! stem > сыз(abe) > poss > case    (?)
!
! *1. "ныкы" form in some Tatar grammars is called "predicative genitive".
!     Indeed, when not substantivised, it has predicative use:
!     "Бу яулык әнинеке." (vs "Әнинең яулыгы.")
! *2. "дай" is considered to be an adverbializer, so no case endings after it (=no <subst> reading).
!     (at least in Tatar, I think that in Kazakh it's the same)
! *3. This doesn't work atm (it's recursive), but it doesn't seem to be very frequent also;
!     Most likely it is restricted to px3sp.
!-------------------------------------------

LEXICON CASE-COMMON

%<gen%>:%>%{N%}%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<dat%>:%>%{G%}%{A%} CLIT ;
%<acc%>:%>%{N%}%{I%} CLIT ;
%<ins%>:%>%{M%}ен CLIT ;

LEXICON CASE

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT-GENERAL ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT-GENERAL ;


LEXICON CASE-2  ! The difference from CASE is that CASE-2 doesn't continue
                ! with personal copula suffixes. Atm used only for <abe>
                ! thing /02082012, IS/

CASE-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: CLIT ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}н CLIT ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} CLIT ;

LEXICON ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE ;

LEXICON ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

! <abe> thing doesn't take personal copula suffixes (JNW, please correct me),
! so SUBST reading of it is linked to CASE-2, not CASE.
! A counterexample could be e.g. "бәхет-сез-мен", but that's only because "бәхетсез"
! has lexicalised as an adjective.

! Note that allowing of the (scarcely existing) [X +<abe> +<pers.cop> (+ modalpcle)] sequence
! would require some additional rules in kaz-tat.t2x /02082012, IS/

%<attr%>: CLIT ;
%<advl%>: CLIT ;
%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON Abessive          ! Doesn't appear after possessives

!%<abe%>:%>с%{I%}з ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;
%+сыз%<post%>:%>с%{I%}з ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}ікі%{n%} CASE ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{I%} ATTR/SUBST ; ! <s>FIXME:NOTE: I am in favour for changing the tag to loc2
                                            ! ("DAGI"=loc2 and not "DAGI"=loc"DA"+attr"GI") But first
                                            ! I'll give some arguments in a mail to apertium-turkic</s>
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}й CLIT ;                ! FIXME:CHECK:In Tatar this is considered to be an adverbializer, so
                                            ! no case endings after it. In Kazakh it should be the same /I.S./ 
LEXICON CASE-ETC

CASE ;
GENPOSS-ETC ;
!%<adv%>:ш%{A%} # ;          ! FIXME: might not be quite the right place

LEXICON POSS-REAL

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}м CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}ң CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{S%}%{I%}%{n%} CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}м%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%{I%}ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON POSSESSION ! I guess this was used once to implement some
                   ! recursive things, e.g. the sequence
                   ! [stem > poss-real > [ныкы]/дагы > poss-real > case]
                   ! Some gerunds link to it
POSS-REAL ;

LEXICON N-INFL-COMMON

POSSESSION ;
CASE-ETC ;
Abessive ; ! FIXME might lead to overgeneration:
           !! check whether it occurs after substantivized stuff;
           !! not all pronouns take it. "Синсез" vs "*үземсез".





!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     ADJECTIVE'S (ADJECTIVIAL) INFLECTION (ADJ-COMMON)

! FIXME: this section might need some refactoring
!! i.e. change <adj><comp><subst> to <adj><subst><comp>
!! and make use of ADJ-LEVELS class

LEXICON ADJ-LEVELS

%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;
CLIT ;

LEXICON A1                ! adjectives that can be both substantivised and andverbialised;
                          ! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
                          !# жақсы, тез

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# жақсы адам
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;             !# жақсырақ іс

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# жақсыны таптым 
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   !# жақсырақты таптым

%<adj%>%<advl%>: CLIT ;                               !# жақсы білемін
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;     !# "...ион көп болса соғұрлым тоқ жақсырақ өтеді."

LEXICON A2                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading;
                           ! <adj> and <adj.subst> readings have comparison levels.
                           !# ескі

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# ескі дос
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ;             !# ескірек заманда

%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "Ол ескіні ертеден есінде сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы болған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}р%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искерәге урынында утырадыр."

LEXICON A3                 ! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
                           ! so-called "predicatives" (бар, жоқ);
                           ! no comparison levels at all.
                           !# көктемгі, басты, бар, жоқ

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# көктемгі су тасқыны
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ;                             !# "...Самаранч ең бастыны түсінді..."
                                                      !# "Аты бардың заты бар."

! FIXME:NOTE:loc.attr/subst form of some of them seems to be pure overgeneration:
! e.g. *язгыдагы

LEXICON A4                 ! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
                           !# ұлттық

%<adj%>: CLIT ;                                       !# ұлттық тағам

LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified N-INFL-COMMON

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!     VERBAL INFLECTION (V-INFL-COMMON)

LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}н CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}ң CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>с%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>с%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>,

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>м CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>ңд%{A%}р CLIT ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>ң%{I%}зд%{A%}р CLIT ;

 LEXICON Adjectives
абсолютті:абсолютті A4 ; ! ""
айтарлықтай:айтарлықтай A4 ; ! ""
американдық:американдық A4 ; ! ""
археологиялық:археологиялық A4 ; ! ""
аумақтық:аумақтық A4 ; ! ""
біртұтас:біртұтас A4 ; ! ""
генетик:генетик A4 ; ! ""
геохимиялық:геохимиялық A4 ; ! ""
гуманитарлық:гуманитарлық A4 ; ! ""
дипломатиялық:дипломатиялық A4 ; ! ""
еуропалық:еуропалық A4 ; ! ""
идеялық:идеялық A4 ; ! ""
интеграциялық:интеграциялық A4 ; ! ""
коммерциялық:коммерциялық A4 ; ! ""
көрнекі:көрнекі A4 ; ! ""
қарасты:қарасты A4 ; ! ""
құрамдас:құрамдас A4 ; ! ""
математикалық:математикалық A4 ; ! ""
мемориалдық:мемориалдық A4 ; ! ""
минералды:минералды A4 ; ! ""
музейлік:музейлік A4 ; ! ""
нарықтық:нарықтық A4 ; ! ""
органикалық:органикалық A4 ; ! ""
пайдалы:пайдалы A4 ; ! ""
практикалық:практикалық A4 ; ! ""
рецессивті:рецессивті A4 ; ! ""
стратиграфиялық:стратиграфиялық A4 ; ! ""
техникалық:техникалық A4 ; ! ""
феодалдық:феодалдық A4 ; ! ""
шетелдік:шетелдік A4 ; ! "foreign"
эпикалық:эпикалық A4 ; ! ""
мүдделі:мүдделі A4 ; ! ""
жылжымайтын:жылжымайтын A4 ; ! ""
сапалы:сапалы A4 ; ! ""
өзекті:өзекті A4 ; ! ""
экстремистік:экстремистік A4 ; ! ""
алғашқы:алғашқы A3 ; ! "~initial"
аппақ:аппақ A3 ; ! ""
арнаулы:арнаулы A3 ; ! ""
асыл:асыл A3 ; ! ""
атақты:атақты A3 ; ! ""
ашулы:ашулы A3 ; ! ""
байланысты:байланысты A3 ; ! ""
бар:бар A3 ; ! ""
бастапқы:бастапқы A3 ; ! ""
бірік:бірік A3 ; ! ""
дәстүрлі:дәстүрлі A3 ; ! ""
жазғы:жазғы A3 ; ! "" FIXME: GI
жасар:жасар A3 ; ! "after numerals: of ageX"
жеке:жеке A3 ; ! "separate"
жоқ:жоқ A3 ;
жылғы:жылғы A3 ; ! "year's" FIXME: GI
жылдық:жылдық A3 ; ! "-летний,годовой,годичный"
ішкі:ішкі A3 ; ! "internal"
кәсіби:кәсіби A3 ; ! ""
келесі:келесі A3 ; ! ""
көктемгі:көктемгі A3 ; ! "" FIXME: GI
көшпелі:көшпелі A3 ; ! ""
қор:қор A3 ; ! ""
қосымша:қосымша A3 ; ! ""
мүмкін:мүмкін A3 ; ! "possible"
рухани:рухани A3 ; ! ""
сүйікті:сүйікті A3 ; ! "favourite"
танымал:танымал A3 ; ! ""
тәуелді:тәуелді A3 ; ! ""
туған:туған A3 ; ! "родной"
туыс:туыс A3 ; ! ""
тұрғын:тұрғын A3 ; ! ""
үздік:үздік A3 ; ! ""
федеральды:федеральды A3 ; ! "федеральный"
ынтымақты:ынтымақты A3 ; ! ""
арғы:арғы A2 ; ! ""
ардақты:ардақты A2 ; ! ""
асау:асау A2 ; ! ""
ауқымды:ауқымды A2 ; ! ""
ащы:ащы A2 ; ! ""
әйгілі:әйгілі A2 ; ! ""
бағалы:бағалы A2 ; ! ""
байыпты:байыпты A2 ; ! ""
басты:басты A2 ; ! ""
батпақты:батпақты A2 ; ! ""
болымсыз:болымсыз A2 ; ! ""
дербес:дербес A2 ; ! ""
ежелгі:ежелгі A2 ; ! ""
есен:есен A2 ; ! ""
жабайы:жабайы A2 ; ! ""
иен:иен A2 ; ! ""
кінәлі:кінәлі A2 ; ! ""
күрделі:күрделі A2 ; ! ""
қайырлы:қайырлы A2 ; ! ""
құдіретті:құдіретті A2 ; ! ""
қызғылт:қызғылт A2 ; ! ""
маңызды:маңызды A2 ; ! ""
момын:момын A2 ; ! ""
нұрлы:нұрлы A2 ; ! ""
салтанатты:салтанатты A2 ; ! ""
тәріздес:тәріздес A2 ; ! ""
тәуелді:тәуелді A2 ; ! ""
тиісті:тиісті A2 ; ! ""
төзімді:төзімді A2 ; ! ""
үстем:үстем A2 ; ! ""
шағын:шағын A2 ; ! ""
ылғалды:ылғалды A2 ; ! ""
кедей:кедей A2 ; ! ""
берік:берік A2 ; ! ""
дәмелі:дәмелі A2 ; ! ""
сорлы:сорлы A2 ; ! ""
айрықша:айрықша A1 ; ! ""
ала:ала A1 ; ! "~speckled/mottled"
аман:аман A1 ; ! ""
арық:арық A1 ; ! "thin"
аулақ:аулақ A1 ; ! ""
әділ:әділ A1 ; ! ""
әскери:әскери A1 ; ! "military"
белгілі:белгілі A1 ; ! "famous"
бос:бос A1 ; ! "empty, free, hollow"
дайым:дайым A1 ; ! ""
дәу:дәу A1 ; ! "giant"
едәуір:едәуір A1 ; ! ""
жақсы:жақсы A1 ; ! "good"
жас:жас A1 ; ! "young"
жоғары:жоғары A1 ; ! "high"
зор:зор A1 ; ! "huge"
кері:кері A1 ; ! ""
көне:көне A1 ; ! "old/ancient (thing)"
қалалық:қалалық A1 ; ! "city-level"
қауқарсыз:қауқарсыз  A1 ; ! ""
қуанышты:қуанышты A1 ; ! "glad"
қылмыстық:қылмыстық A1 ; ! "criminal"
мөлдір:мөлдір A1 ; ! "clear (clean/transparent)"
облыстық:облыстық A1 ; ! "oblast-level"
өзгеше:өзгеше A1 ; ! "special/particular"
сол:сол A1 ; ! "left"
табысты:табысты A1 ; ! ""
тегін:тегін A1 ; ! ""
тік:тік A1 ; ! ""
түркі:түркі A1 ; ! "Turkic"
тын:тын A1 ; ! ""
ұзынша:ұзынша A1 ; ! ""
шірік:шірік A1 ; ! "rotten"
астыртын:астыртын A1 ; ! ""
сенімді:сенімді A1 ; ! ""
кездейсоқ:кездейсоқ A1 ; ! ""
жарты:жарты A1 ; ! "half"
алдыңғы:алдыңғы A3 ; ! "forward"
